Tennessee statutes. Title 37 Juveniles
Part 6

Child Sexual Abuse

37-1-601. Prevention of child sexual abuse deemed priority of state — Comprehensive approach — Purpose and construction of part.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

The incidence of child sexual abuse has a tremendous impact on the victimized child, siblings, family structure, and inevitably on all citizens of this state;

The detection, intervention, prevention and treatment of child sexual abuse, including a focus on the sexual abuse that occurs within the home, shall be a priority of this state;

Sexual abuse in any form is destructive to the physical and mental health of a child;

Ninety-three percent (93%) of all sexual abuse is inflicted by a family member or acquaintance in the child's home environment;

It is necessary that curriculum addressing sexual abuse include a focus on the in-home abuse; and

A comprehensive approach for the detection, intervention, prevention and treatment of child sexual abuse, including such abuse that may occur in the home, should be developed for the state and that this planned, comprehensive approach should be used as a basis for funding.

The purpose of this part shall be the same as that of part 4 of this chapter, and, except as may be expressly herein provided, the provisions of this part shall not be construed as repealing any provisions of part 4 of this chapter or of any other statute, but shall be supplementary thereto and cumulative thereof.

Acts 1985, ch. 478, § 2; 1987, ch. 145, § 1; 2014, ch. 706, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2014, ch. 706, § 1 provided that this act shall be known and may be cited as “Erin's Law.”

Amendments. The 2014 amendment rewrote (a) which read: “The incidence of child sexual abuse has a tremendous impact on the victimized child, siblings, family structure, and inevitably on all citizens of this state, and has caused the general assembly to determine that the prevention of child sexual abuse shall be a priority of this state. To further this end, it is the intent of the general assembly that a comprehensive approach for the detection, intervention, prevention and treatment of child sexual abuse be developed for the state and that this planned, comprehensive approach be used as a basis for funding.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 706, § 4. July 1, 2014.

Cross-References. Access to Tennessee bureau of investigation computer registry files to verify criminal violation information of persons applying to work with children, §38-6-109.

Competency of sexually abused child as witness in judicial proceedings, Tenn R. Evid. R. 601.

Courses in detection and treatment of child sexual abuse, §49-7-117.

Criminal injuries compensation for child sexual abuse victims, §§29-13-106,29-13-108.

Criminal injuries compensation fund privilege tax on persons committing sexual offenses upon children, §40-24-107.

False reporting of child sexual abuse, §37-1-413.

Offenders with severe impairments, title 33, ch. 6, part 3.

Notice to judge of child sexual abuse, §37-1-405.

Physician, health personnel or institutional report of venereal disease, herpes or chlamydia in children, §37-1-403.

Restraining orders, §37-1-152.

Severe child abuse defined, §37-1-102.

Sex crime prosecution units, §8-7-109.

Sexual abuse treatment program for sex offenders, §41-21-235.

Tennessee bureau of investigation central registry of sexual offenders, §38-6-110.

Termination of parental rights for commission of aggravated rape upon child, §37-1-147.

Termination of parental rights for severe child abuse, §37-1-406.

Law Reviews.

Video Taping and the Tennessee Child Sexual Abuse Act of 1985 (Jerry N. Estes), 22 No. 5, Tenn. B.J. 29 (1986).

“The Politics of Protecting Children”: Panel Discussion 2: Litigation For Change (Jacqueline Dixon, Professor Dean Rivkin and Robert Schwartz), 7 Tenn. J. L. & Pol'y 218 (2011).

“The Politics of Protecting Children”: Panel Discussion 4: Best Practices In Representing Children in Court (The Honorable Timothy Irwin, Carlton Lewis and Dwight Stokes), 7 Tenn. J. L. & Pol'y 324 (2011).

“The Politics of Protecting Children”: Panel Discussion 3: Confronting Political and Economic Challenges (Representative Sherry Jones, Connie Steere and Mary Walker), 7 Tenn. J. L. & Pol'y 289 (2011).

“The Politics of Protecting Children”: Keynote Address Revisiting Luzerne County: Promoting Fairness, Transparency and Accountability In Juvenile Court (Robert Schwartz), 7 Tenn. J. L. & Pol'y 263 (2011).

Differential Response in Child Protection Services: Perpetuating the Illusion of Voluntariness (Soledad A. McGrath), 42 U. Mem. L. Rev. 629 (2012).

37-1-602. Part definitions — Harm to child's health or welfare.

For purposes of this part and §§ 8-7-109, 37-1-152, 37-1-403, 37-1-406, 37-1-413 and 49-7-117, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Child care agency” is as defined in §§ 71-3-501 and 37-5-501;

“Child protection team” means the investigation team created by § 37-1-607;

“Child sexual abuse” means the commission of any act involving the unlawful sexual abuse, molestation, fondling or carnal knowledge of a child under thirteen (13) years of age that prior to November 1, 1989, constituted the criminal offense of:

Aggravated rape under § 39-2-603 [repealed];

Aggravated sexual battery under § 39-2-606 [repealed];

Assault with intent to commit rape or attempt to commit rape or sexual battery under § 39-2-608 [repealed];

Begetting child on wife's sister under § 39-4-307 [repealed];

Crimes against nature under § 39-2-612 [repealed];

Incest under § 39-4-306 [repealed];

Promotion of performance including sexual conduct by minor under § 39-6-1138 [repealed];

Rape under § 39-2-604 [repealed];

Sexual battery under § 39-2-607 [repealed]; or

Use of minor for obscene purposes under § 39-6-1137 [repealed];

“Child sexual abuse” also means the commission of any act involving the unlawful sexual abuse, molestation, fondling or carnal knowledge of a child under thirteen (13) years of age that on or after November 1, 1989, constituted the criminal offense of:

Aggravated rape under § 39-13-502;

Aggravated sexual battery under § 39-13-504;

Aggravated sexual exploitation of a minor under § 39-17-1004;

Criminal attempt as provided in § 39-12-101 for any of the offenses in (a)(3)(B)(i)-(iii);

Especially aggravated sexual exploitation of a minor under § 39-17-1005;

Incest under § 39-15-302;

Rape under § 39-13-503;

Sexual battery under § 39-13-505; or

Sexual exploitation of a minor under § 39-17-1003;

“Child sexual abuse” also means one (1) or more of the following acts:

Any penetration, however slight, of the vagina or anal opening of one (1) person by the penis of another person, whether or not there is the emission of semen;

Any contact between the genitals or anal opening of one (1) person and the mouth or tongue of another person;

Any intrusion by one (1) person into the genitals or anal opening of another person, including the use of any object for this purpose, except that it shall not include acts intended for a valid medical purpose;

The intentional touching of the genitals or intimate parts, including the breasts, genital area, groin, inner thighs, and buttocks, or the clothing covering them, of either the child or the perpetrator, except that it shall not include:

Acts that may reasonably be construed to be normal caretaker responsibilities, interactions with, or affection for a child; or

Acts intended for a valid medical purpose;

The intentional exposure of the perpetrator's genitals in the presence of a child, or any other sexual act intentionally perpetrated in the presence of a child, if such exposure or sexual act is for the purpose of sexual arousal or gratification, aggression, degradation, or other similar purpose;

The sexual exploitation of a child, which includes allowing, encouraging, or forcing a child to:

Solicit for or engage in prostitution; or

Engage in an act prohibited by § 39-17-1003;

The commission of any act towards the child prohibited by § 39-13-309; and

For the purposes of the reporting, investigation, and treatment provisions of §§ 37-1-603 — 37-1-615 “child sexual abuse” also means the commission of any act specified in subdivisions (a)(3)(A)-(C) against a child thirteen (13) years of age through seventeen (17) years of age if such act is committed against the child by a parent, guardian, relative, person residing in the child's home, or other person responsible for the care and custody of the child;

“Department” means the department of children's services;

“Guardian ad litem” means a responsible adult who is appointed by the court to represent the best interests of a child in a proceeding as provided for by law, who shall be a party to any judicial proceeding as a representative of the child, and who shall serve until discharged by the court;

“Institutional child sexual abuse” means situations of known or suspected child sexual abuse in which the person allegedly perpetrating the child sexual abuse is an employee of a public or private child care agency, public or private school, or any other person responsible for the child's care;

“Mental injury” means an injury to the intellectual or psychological capacity of a child as evidenced by a discernible and substantial impairment in the child's ability to function within the child's normal range of performance and behavior, with due regard to the child's culture; and

“Other person responsible for a child's care or welfare” includes, but is not limited to, the child's legal guardian, legal custodian, or foster parent; an employee of a public or private child care agency, public or private school; or any other person legally responsible for the child's welfare in a residential setting.

Harm to a child's health or welfare can occur when the parent or other person responsible for the child's welfare:

Commits, or allows to be committed, child sexual abuse as defined in subdivisions (a)(3)(A)-(C); or

Exploits a child under eighteen (18) years of age, or allows such child to be exploited, as provided in §§ 39-17-1003 — 39-17-1005.

Acts 1985, ch. 478, § 3; 1988, ch. 953, § 12; 1996, ch. 1079, § 73; 2000, ch. 981, §§ 51, 55; 2008, ch. 893, §§ 1, 2; 2017, ch. 292, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Sections in title 39, chs. 1-6, referred to in this section, were repealed by Acts 1989, ch. 591.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment added (3)(C)(vii) in the definition of “child sexual abuse”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 292, § 4. July 1, 2017.

Cross-References. Severe child abuse defined, §37-1-102.

37-1-603. Comprehensive state plan.

The department shall develop a state plan that encompasses and complies with the scope of all provisions of this part for the detection, intervention, prevention and treatment of child sexual abuse. The department of education and the state board of education shall participate and fully cooperate in the development of the state plan. Furthermore, appropriate state and local agencies and organizations shall be provided an opportunity to participate in the development of the state plan. Appropriate groups and organizations shall include, but not be limited to, community mental health centers; the juvenile courts; the school boards of the local school districts; private or public organizations or programs with recognized expertise in working with children who are sexually abused, physically abused, emotionally abused, or neglected and with expertise in working with the families of such children; private or public programs or organizations with expertise in maternal and infant health care; multi-disciplinary child protection teams; child care centers; and law enforcement agencies. The state plan to be provided to the general assembly, the appropriate committees and the governor shall include, as a minimum, the information required of the various groups in subsection (b).

The development of the comprehensive state plan shall be accomplished in the following manner:

The department of children's services shall establish a task force composed of representatives from the department of mental health and substance abuse services, department of intellectual and developmental disabilities, the commission on children and youth created by § 37-3-102, a child abuse agency as defined in § 37-5-501, a treatment resource as defined in § 33-1-101, and a local child service agency. Representatives of the departments of children's services, education, health, the Tennessee bureau of investigation, district attorneys general conference, Tennessee council of juvenile and family court judges, and local law enforcement agencies shall serve as ex officio members of the task force. The task force shall be responsible for:

Developing a plan of action for better coordination and integration of the goals, activities, and funding of the department pertaining to the detection, intervention, prevention, and treatment of child sexual abuse in order to maximize staff and resources, including the effective utilization of licensure personnel in determining whether children are properly cared for and protected by the child care agencies licensed by the department of children's services or human services. The department shall develop ways not only to inform and instruct all personnel in the child care agencies in the detection, intervention, prevention and treatment of child sexual abuse, but shall develop ways for licensure personnel at least annually to require that all such agencies present a prevention program to the children enrolled in and cared for by the agency. Licensing staff shall provide training to such agencies if needed to assist them in presenting such a program and shall review and approve the materials to be presented. The department shall formulate an effective and efficient method for updating files of victims of child sexual abuse. The plan for accomplishing this end shall be included in the comprehensive state plan;

Preparing the state plan for submission to the members of the general assembly and the governor. Such preparation shall include the cooperative plans as provided in this section and the plan of action for coordination and integration of departmental activities into one (1) comprehensive plan. The comprehensive plan shall include a section reflecting general conditions and needs, an analysis of variations based on population or geographic areas, identified problems, and recommendations for change; and

Working with the specified agency in fulfilling the requirements of subdivisions (b)(2), (3), (4), (5) and (6);

The department of education and the state board of education and the department of children's services shall work together in developing ways to inform and instruct appropriate school personnel and children in all school districts in the detection, intervention, prevention and treatment of child sexual abuse and in the proper action that should be taken in a suspected case of child sexual abuse. The plan for accomplishing this end shall be included in the comprehensive state plan;

The departments of education and children's services, and the state board of education, shall work together on the enhancement or adaptation of curriculum materials to assist instructional personnel in providing instruction through a multi-disciplinary approach on the detection, intervention, prevention and treatment of child sexual abuse, including such abuse that may occur in the home, including, but not limited to, instruction provided as part of a family life curriculum pursuant to § 49-6-1304. The curriculum materials shall be geared toward a sequential program of instruction at progressional levels for kindergarten through grade twelve (K-12). Strategies for utilizing the curriculum shall be included in the comprehensive plan;

The Jerry F. Agee Tennessee Law Enforcement Academy, the Tennessee peace officer standards and training commission, and the department of children's services shall work together in developing ways to inform and instruct appropriate local law enforcement personnel in the detection of child sexual abuse and in the proper action that should be taken in a suspected case of child sexual abuse:

Guidelines shall be prepared establishing a standard procedure that may be followed by police agencies in the investigation of cases involving sexual abuse of children, including police response to, and treatment of, victims of such crimes;

The course of training leading to the basic certificate issued by the Tennessee peace officer standards and training commission shall include adequate instruction in the procedures described in subdivision (b)(4)(A) and shall be included as a part of the in-service training requirement to be eligible for the salary supplement authorized in § 38-8-111;

A course of study pursuant to such procedures for the training of specialists in the investigation of child sexual abuse cases shall be implemented by the Jerry F. Agee Tennessee Law Enforcement Training Academy. Officers assigned as investigation specialists for these crimes shall successfully complete their training;

The peace officers standards and training commission may authorize the certification of officers under this section if the officers have received training meeting the criteria established in subdivision (b)(4)(A) from any other approved training course at sites other than the Jerry F. Agee Tennessee Law Enforcement Training Academy; and

It is the intent of the general assembly to encourage the establishment of child sex crime investigation units in sheriffs' departments and police agencies throughout the state, which units shall include investigating crimes involving sexual abuse of children;

The plan for accomplishing this end shall be included in the comprehensive state plan;

The department of children's services shall work with other appropriate public and private agencies to emphasize efforts to educate the general public about the problem of and ways to detect, intervene in, prevent and treat child sexual abuse, and in the proper action that should be taken in a suspected case of child sexual abuse. Such plan shall include a method for publicizing and notifying the general public of the resources and agencies available to provide help and services for victimized children and their families. The plan for accomplishing this end shall be included in the comprehensive state plan; and

The department of children's services and the joint task force on children's justice and child sexual abuse shall work together in developing a mechanism to inform and instruct judges with juvenile, divorce and criminal jurisdiction in the detection, intervention, prevention and treatment of child sexual abuse and in the proper action that should be taken in a known or suspected case of child sexual abuse. The plan for accomplishing this end shall be included in the comprehensive state plan.

All budget requests submitted by the department of children's services, the department of education, or any other agency to the general assembly for funding of efforts for the detection, intervention, prevention, and treatment of child sexual abuse shall be based on the state comprehensive plan developed pursuant to this section.

The department of children's services shall readdress the plan one (1) year following its initial presentation and at least biennially thereafter, and shall make necessary revisions. No later than January 31, 1987, and no later than January 31 of every uneven year thereafter, such revisions shall be submitted to the government operations committees of both houses of the general assembly and to the governor.

Acts 1985, ch. 478, § 4; 1987, ch. 145, § 27; 1988, ch. 953, § 13; 1989, ch. 278, § 36; 1996, ch. 1079, § 73; 2000, ch. 947, § 6; 2000, ch. 981, §§ 51, 56; 2009, ch. 238, § 2; 2010, ch. 1100, § 53; 2012, ch. 575, § 1; 2014, ch. 706, § 3; 2018, ch. 609, § 3; 2019, ch. 420, § 26.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2014, ch. 706, § 1 provided that this act shall be known and may be cited as “Erin's Law.”

Acts 2018, ch. 609, § 4 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to the 2018-2019 school year and each school year thereafter.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment in (b)(3) added “, including such abuse that may occur in the home.” to the first sentence and substituted “kindergarten through grade twelve (K-12)” for “kindergarten (K) through grade six (6)” in the second sentence.

The 2018 amendment added “, including, but not limited to, instruction provided as part of a family life curriculum pursuant to §49-6-1304” at the end of first sentence in (b)(3).

The 2019 amendment substituted “joint task force on children's justice and child sexual abuse” for “judicial council” near the beginning of (b)(6).

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 706, § 4. July 1, 2014.

Acts 2018, ch. 609, § 4. April 2, 2018.

Acts 2019, ch. 420, § 27. May 21, 2019.

37-1-604. Legislative intent relating to investigations, protective services and reports.

The intent of §§37-1-604 —37-1-615 is to provide for the investigation of child sexual abuse by the child protection team, and to provide for comprehensive protective services for sexually abused children found in the state by requiring that reports of each sexually abused child be made to the department and the office of the district attorney general in an effort to prevent further harm to the child or any other children living in the home and to preserve the family life of the parents and children, to the maximum extent possible, by enhancing the parental capacity for adequate child care.

Acts 1985, ch. 478, § 5.

37-1-605. Reports of known or suspected child sexual abuse — Investigations — Notification to parents of abuse on school grounds or while under school supervision — Confidentiality of records.

Any person including, but not limited to, any:

Physician, osteopathic physician, medical examiner, chiropractor, nurse or hospital personnel engaged in the admission, examination, care or treatment of persons;

Health or mental health professional other than one listed in subdivision (1);

Practitioner who relies solely on spiritual means for healing;

School teacher or other school official or personnel;

Judge of any court of the state;

Social worker, day care center worker, or other professional child care, foster care, residential or institutional worker;

Law enforcement officer;

Authority figure at a community facility, including any facility used for recreation or social assemblies, for educational, religious, social, health, or welfare purposes, including, but not limited to, facilities operated by schools, the boy or girl scouts, the YMCA or YWCA, the boys and girls club, or church or religious organizations; or

Neighbor, relative, friend or any other person;

who knows or has reasonable cause to suspect that a child has been sexually abused shall report such knowledge or suspicion to the department in the manner prescribed in subsection (b).

Each report of known or suspected child sexual abuse pursuant to this section shall be made immediately to the local office of the department responsible for the investigation of reports made pursuant to this section or to the judge having juvenile jurisdiction or to the office of the sheriff or the chief law enforcement official of the municipality where the child resides. Each report of known or suspected child sexual abuse occurring in a facility licensed by the department of mental health and substance abuse services, as defined in § 33-2-403, or any hospital, shall also be made to the local law enforcement agency in the jurisdiction where such offense occurred. In addition to those procedures provided by this part, § 37-1-405 shall also apply to all cases reported hereunder.

If a law enforcement official or judge becomes aware of known or suspected child sexual abuse, through personal knowledge, receipt of a report or otherwise, such information shall be reported to the department immediately and the child protective team shall be notified to investigate the report for the protection of the child in accordance with this part. Further criminal investigation by such official shall be appropriately conducted.

Reports involving known or suspected institutional child sexual abuse shall be made and received in the same manner as all other reports made pursuant to this section.

Any person required to report or investigate cases of suspected child sexual abuse who has reasonable cause to suspect that a child died as a result of child sexual abuse shall report such suspicion to the appropriate medical examiner. The medical examiner shall accept the report for investigation and shall report the medical examiner's findings, in writing, to the local law enforcement agency, the appropriate district attorney general, and the department. Autopsy reports maintained by the medical examiner shall not be subject to the confidentiality requirements provided for in § 37-1-612.

Notwithstanding § 37-5-107 or § 37-1-612, if a school teacher, school official, or other school personnel has knowledge or reasonable cause to suspect that a child who attends the school may be a victim of child abuse or child sexual abuse sufficient to require reporting pursuant to this section, then the school teacher, school official, or other school personnel must follow the procedures outlined in § 49-6-1601.

For purposes of this subsection (d), “school” means any public or privately operated child care agency, as defined in § 71-3-501; child care program, as defined in § 49-1-1102; preschool; nursery school; kindergarten; elementary school; or secondary school.

Acts 1985, ch. 478, § 6; 1987, ch. 145, §§ 2, 11; 1988, ch. 953, § 14; 1993, ch. 439, § 2; 1994, ch. 901, § 2; 2000, ch. 947, §§ 6, 8M; 2008, ch. 1011, § 2; 2009, ch. 283, §§ 4, 5; 2010, ch. 1100, § 54; 2012, ch. 575, § 1; 2014, ch. 761, § 1; 2020, ch. 708, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 1011, § 4 provided that the state board of education, acting in consultation with the department of children's services, is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. The rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment, deleted “or” at the end of (a)(7), added (a)(8) and redesignated former (a)(8) as present (a)(9).

The 2020 amendment rewrote (d)(1) which read: “Notwithstanding §37-5-107 or §37-1-612 or any other law to the contrary, if a school teacher, school official or any other school personnel has knowledge or reasonable cause to suspect that a child who attends such school may be a victim of child abuse or child sexual abuse sufficient to require reporting pursuant to this section and that the abuse occurred on school grounds or while the child was under the supervision or care of the school, then the principal or other person designated by the school shall verbally notify the parent or legal guardian of the child that a report pursuant to this section has been made and shall provide other information relevant to the future well-being of the child while under the supervision or care of the school. The verbal notice shall be made in coordination with the department of children's services to the parent or legal guardian within twenty-four (24) hours from the time the school, school teacher, school official or other school personnel reports the abuse to the department of children's services; provided, that in no event may the notice be later than twenty-four (24) hours from the time the report was made. The notice shall not be given to any parent or legal guardian if there is reasonable cause to believe that the parent or legal guardian may be the perpetrator or in any way responsible for the child abuse or child sexual abuse.”; deleted former (d)(2) which read: “Once notice is given pursuant to subdivision (d)(1), the principal or other designated person shall provide to the parent or legal guardian all school information and records relevant to the alleged abuse or sexual abuse, if requested by the parent or legal guardian; provided, that the information is edited to protect the confidentiality of the identity of the person who made the report, any other person whose life or safety may be endangered by the disclosure, and any information made confidential pursuant to federal law or §10-7-504(a)(4). The information and records described in this subdivision (d)(2) shall not include records of other agencies or departments.”; and redesignated former (d)(3) as present (d)(2) and inserted “; child care program, as defined in §49-1-1102;”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 761, § 2. July 1, 2014.

Acts 2020, ch. 708, § 4. August 1, 2020.

Cross-References. Child Rape Protection Act of 2006, §39-15-210.

Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

False reporting of child sexual abuse, §37-1-413.

Penalty for failure to report child sexual abuse, §37-1-615.

Physician, health personnel or institutional report of venereal disease in children, §37-1-403.

Tennessee bureau of investigation central registry of sexual offenders, §38-6-110.

Reporting by physicians performing elective abortions, §39-15-210.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in the Advisory Commission Comments under Rule 501 of the Tennessee Rules of Evidence.

Textbooks. Tennessee Law of Evidence (2nd ed., Cohen, Paine and Sheppeard), Rule 501.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee's Adoption of the Planning-Operational Test for Determining Discretionary Function Immunity Under the Governmental Tort Liability Act, 60 Tenn. L. Rev. 633 (1993).

Attorney General Opinions. Duty of school officials to report student's sending of photographs depicting nudity of minor. OAG 13-83, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 84 (10/28/13).

37-1-606. Departmental availability for receiving reports — Commencement of investigations — Institutional abuse.

The department shall be capable of receiving and investigating reports of known or suspected child sexual abuse twenty-four (24) hours a day, seven (7) days a week. If it appears that the immediate safety or well-being of a child is endangered, that the family may flee or the child will be unavailable for purposes of conducting a child protective investigation, or that the facts otherwise so warrant, the department shall commence an investigation immediately, regardless of the time of day or night. In all other child sexual abuse cases, a child protective investigation shall be commenced within twenty-four (24) hours of receipt of the report.

If, as a result of an investigation of a report of institutional child sexual abuse, the department removes children under its care from such institution, the department shall notify parents who have children enrolled in such institution on such date of its action. The institution's records shall be utilized to obtain such information. The notification shall be sufficient if it states that children under the care of the department are being removed. If the department validates child sexual abuse in such institution or revokes or suspends the license of a child care agency as a result of child sexual abuse occurring in the agency, the department, in accordance with administrative and due process rules, shall notify the parents of the children accordingly.

Acts 1985, ch. 478, § 7; 1987, ch. 145, §§ 3, 4; 1988, ch. 953, §§ 15-17; 2000, ch. 981, § 51.

Compiler's Notes. Former subdivisions (a)(2) and (4), concerning reports and investigations of child sexual abuse, were transferred to §37-1-607(b)(2) and (3) in 1987.

Cross-References. Admissibility into evidence of audio-visually recorded testimony in child sexual abuse proceedings, §24-7-117.

Child sexual abuse autopsy reports exempted from confidentiality requirements, §37-1-403.

Protective custody of child by hospital or physician, §37-1-404.

Sex crime prosecution units, §8-7-109.

Video recording of investigations authorized, §37-1-609.